California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(7) Knowingly give false information to a district employee, or contracted security officer, engaged in the enforcement of a district ordinance or a state law, or otherwise obstruct the issuance of a citation for the violation of a district ordinance or a state law.

(8) Violate any of the conditions established by a transit district ordinance under which a passenger may board a transit vehicle with a bicycle and where that bicycle may be stowed on the transit vehicle.

(b) For purposes of this section, “transit district” means an entity that qualifies as a claimant, as defined in Section 99203, eligible to receive allocations under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200).

(c) A violation of this section is an infraction under Section 19.8 of the Penal
 Code punishable by a fine not exceeding seventy-five dollars ($75), and a violation by a person after a second conviction is punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or by community service that does not conflict with the violator’s hours of school attendance or employment for a total time not to exceed 48 hours over a period not to exceed 60 days.

(d) A transit district shall provide reasonable notification to the public of the activities prohibited by this section and the penalties for violations of those prohibitions.

(e) This section does not prohibit a person from engaging in activities that are protected under the laws of the United States or of this state, including, but not limited to, picketing, demonstrating, or distributing handbills.

(f) Revenue from fines imposed pursuant to
 subdivision (c) shall not be distributed or allocated to the transit agency issuing citations under this section. Fine revenue instead shall be allocated to the other entities eligible to receive those funds under existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 534, Sec. 2.   (AB 1337)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

99171.

(a) (1) A transit district may issue a prohibition order to any person to whom any of the following applies:

(A) On at least three separate occasions within a period of 90 consecutive days, the person is cited for an infraction committed in or on a vehicle, bus stop, or train or light rail station of the transit district or a property, facility, or vehicle upon which the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District owes policing responsibilities to a local government pursuant to an operations and maintenance agreement or similar interagency
 agreement for an act that is a violation of paragraph (2) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 99170 of this code or paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 640 or Section 640.5 of the Penal Code.

(B) The person is arrested or convicted for a misdemeanor or felony committed in or on a vehicle, bus stop, or light rail station of the transit district for acts involving violence, threats of violence, lewd or lascivious behavior, or possession for sale or sale of a controlled substance.

(C) The person is convicted of a violation of Section 11532 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A person subject to a prohibition order may not enter the property, facilities, or vehicles of the transit district or the property, facilities, or vehicles upon which the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District owes
 policing responsibilities to a local government pursuant to an operations and maintenance agreement or similar interagency agreement for a period of time deemed appropriate by the transit district, provided that the duration of a prohibition order shall not exceed the following, as applicable:

(A) Thirty days if issued pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), provided that a second prohibition order within one year shall not exceed 90 days, and a third or subsequent prohibition order within one year shall not exceed 180 days.

(B) Thirty days if issued pursuant to an arrest pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1). Upon conviction of a misdemeanor offense, the duration of the prohibition order for the conviction, when added to the duration of the prohibition order for the initial arrest, if any, shall not exceed 180 days. Upon conviction of a felony offense, the duration of the prohibition order for the conviction, when added to the duration of the prohibition order for the initial arrest, if any, shall not exceed one year.

(3) A prohibition order issued pursuant to this subdivision shall not be effective unless the transit district first affords the person an opportunity to contest the transit district’s proposed action in accordance with procedures adopted by the transit district for this purpose. A transit district’s procedures shall provide, at a minimum, for the notice and other protections set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c), and the transit district shall provide reasonable notification to the public of the availability of those procedures.

(b) (1) A notice of a prohibition order issued under subdivision (a) shall set forth a description of the conduct underlying the violation or violations giving rise to the prohibition order, including reference to the applicable statutory provision, ordinance, or transit district rule violated, the date of the violation, the approximate
 time of the violation, the location where the violation occurred, the period of the proposed prohibition, and the scope of the prohibition. The notice shall include a clear and conspicuous statement indicating the procedure for contesting the prohibition order. The notice of prohibition order shall be personally served upon the violator. The notice of prohibition order, or a copy, shall be considered a record kept in the ordinary course of business of the transit district and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in the notice establishing a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence. For purposes of this paragraph, “clear and conspicuous” means in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the language.

(2) For purposes of this
 section, “personal service” means any of the following:

(A) In-person delivery.

(B) Delivery by any form of mail providing for delivery confirmation, postage prepaid, to at least one address provided by the person being served, including, but not limited to, the address set forth in any citation or in court records.

(C) Any alternate method approved in writing by the transit district and the person being served.

(3) If a person served with a notice of prohibition order is not able, or refuses, to provide a mailing address, the notice of prohibition order shall set forth the procedure for obtaining any letters, notices, or orders related to the prohibition order from the administrative offices of the transit district. For purposes of this section,
 delivery shall be deemed to have been made on the following date, as applicable:

(A) On the date of delivery, if delivered in person.

(B) On the date of confirmed delivery, for any delivery by mail.

(C) For any alternate method of service, as provided in the writing specifying the alternate method.

(4) Proof of service of the notice shall be filed with the transit district.

(5) If a person contests a notice of prohibition order, the transit district shall proceed in accordance with subdivision (c). If the notice of prohibition order is not contested within 10 calendar days after delivery by personal service, the prohibition order shall be deemed final and shall go into effect, without
 further action by the transit district, for the period of time set forth in the order.

(6) All prohibition orders shall be subject to an automatic stay and shall not take effect until the latest of the following:

(A) Eleven calendar days after delivery of the prohibition order by personal service.

(B) If an initial review is timely requested under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), 11 calendar days after delivery by personal service of the results of the review.

(C) If an administrative hearing is timely requested under paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), the date the hearing officer’s decision is delivered by personal service.

(c) (1) For a period of 10 calendar days
 from the delivery of the prohibition order by personal service, the person may request an initial review of the prohibition order by the transit district. The request may be made by telephone, in writing, or in person. There shall be no charge for this review. In conducting its review and reaching a determination, the transit district shall determine whether the prohibition order meets the requirements of subdivision (a) and, unless the person has been convicted of the offense or offenses, whether the offense or offenses for which the person was cited or arrested are proven by a preponderance of the evidence. If, following the initial review, based on these findings, the transit district determines that the prohibition order is not adequately supported or that extenuating circumstances make dismissal of the prohibition order appropriate in the interest of justice, the transit district shall cancel the notice. If, following the initial review, based on these findings, the transit district determines that the
 prohibition order should be upheld in whole or in part, the transit district shall issue a written statement to that effect, including any modification to the period or scope of the prohibition order. The transit district shall serve the results of the initial review to the person contesting the notice by personal service.

(2) The transit district may modify or cancel a prohibition order in the interest of justice. The transit district shall cancel a prohibition order if it determines that the person did not understand the nature and extent of their actions or did not have the ability to control their actions. If the person is dependent upon the transit system for trips of necessity, including, but not limited to, travel to or from medical or legal appointments, school or training classes, places of employment, or obtaining food, clothing, and necessary household items, the transit district shall modify a prohibition order to allow for those
 trips. A person requesting a cancellation or modification in the interest of justice shall have the burden of establishing the qualifying circumstances by a preponderance of the evidence.

(3) If the person is dissatisfied with the results of the initial review, the person may request an administrative hearing of the prohibition order no later than 10 calendar days after the results of the initial review are delivered by personal service. The request may be made by telephone, in writing, or in person. An administrative hearing shall be held within 30 calendar days after the receipt of a request for an administrative hearing. The person requesting the hearing may request one continuance, not to exceed seven calendar days.

(4) The administrative hearing process shall include all of the following:

(A) The person
 requesting the hearing shall have the choice of a hearing by mail or in person. An in-person hearing shall be conducted within the jurisdiction of the transit district.

(B) The administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with written procedures established by the transit district and approved by the governing body or chief executive officer of the transit district. The hearing shall provide an independent, objective, fair, and impartial review of the prohibition order.

(C) The administrative review shall be conducted before a hearing officer designated to conduct the review by the transit district’s governing body or chief executive officer. In addition to any other requirements, a hearing officer shall demonstrate the qualifications, training, and objectivity prescribed by the transit agency’s governing body or chief executive officer as are necessary to fulfill and
 that are consistent with the duties and responsibilities set forth in this subdivision. The hearing officer’s continued service, performance evaluation, compensation, and benefits, as applicable, shall not be directly or indirectly linked to the number of prohibition orders upheld by the hearing officer.

(D) The person who issued the notice of prohibition order shall not be required to participate in an administrative hearing, unless participation is requested by the person requesting the hearing. The request for participation shall be made at least five calendar days before the date of the hearing and may be made by telephone, in writing, or in person. The notice of prohibition order, in proper form, shall be prima facie evidence of the violation or violations pursuant to subdivision (a) establishing a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(E) In
 issuing a decision, the hearing officer shall determine whether the prohibition order meets the requirements of subdivision (a) and, unless the person has been convicted of the offense or offenses, whether the offense or offenses for which the person was cited or arrested are proven by a preponderance of the evidence. Based upon these findings, the hearing officer may uphold the prohibition order in whole, determine that the prohibition order is not adequately supported, or cancel or modify the prohibition order in the interest of justice. The hearing officer shall cancel a prohibition order if they determine that the person did not understand the nature and extent of their actions or did not have the ability to control their actions. If the person is dependent upon the transit system for trips of necessity, including, but not limited to, travel to or from medical or legal appointments, school or training classes, places of employment, or obtaining food, clothing, and necessary household items, the transit
 district shall modify a prohibition order to allow for those trips. A person requesting a cancellation or modification in the interest of justice shall have the burden of establishing the qualifying circumstances by a preponderance of the evidence.

(F) The hearing officer’s decision following the administrative hearing shall be delivered by personal service.

(G) A person aggrieved by the final decision of the hearing officer may seek judicial review of the decision within 90 days of the date of delivery of the decision by personal service, as provided by Section 1094.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) A person issued a prohibition order under subdivision (a) may, within 10 calendar days of the date the order goes into effect under paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), request a refund for any prepaid fare media
 rendered unusable in whole or in part by the prohibition order, including, but not limited to, monthly passes. If the fare media remain usable for one or more days outside the period of the prohibition order, the refund shall be prorated based on the number of days the fare media will be unusable. The issuance of a refund may be made contingent on surrender of the fare media.

(e) For purposes of this section, “transit district” means the Sacramento Regional Transit District, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority, the Fresno Area Express, the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority, or the Santa Monica
 Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 189, Sec. 1.   (SB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

99172.

(a) Before exercising the authority given in subdivision (a) of Section 99171 to issue prohibition orders, a transit district shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish an advisory committee for the purpose of evaluating the procedures for, and issuance of, prohibition orders and recommending a course of training for personnel charged with
 issuing and enforcing prohibition orders.

(2) Ensure that personnel to be charged with issuing and enforcing prohibition orders have received training as recommended by the advisory committee.

(3) Provide reasonable notification to transit district riders that persons who engage in disorderly conduct may be subject to a prohibition order barring the person from the transit district’s property, facilities, or vehicles for a period of up to one year. “Reasonable notification” may include, but is not limited to, information on the transit district’s internet website, in written materials, at transit stations, and on citations
 issued by the transit district of the types of conduct that may result in issuance of a prohibition order.

(b) The advisory committee shall be composed of at least five members appointed by the legislative body of the transit district. At least one of the members of the advisory committee shall have experience working with individuals with psychiatric, developmental, or other disabilities, at least one member shall be a youth advocate, and at least one member shall have law enforcement experience.

(c) The advisory committee shall be tasked, at a minimum, with all of the following:

(1) Providing recommendations, in consultation with the county mental health director within the service area of the transit district, regarding the type and extent of training that should be undertaken by individuals with responsibility
 for
 issuing and enforcing prohibition orders, with particular emphasis on training designed to assist those individuals in identifying and interacting with persons who are homeless or who have psychiatric, developmental, or other disabilities.

(2) Identifying, in consultation with the county mental health director within the service area of the transit district, services and programs to which persons who are homeless or who have psychiatric, developmental, or other disabilities may be referred by transit district enforcement personnel before or in conjunction with issuance of a prohibition order.

(3) Monitoring the issuance of prohibition orders to assist the transit district in ensuring compliance with Section 51 of the Civil Code.

(4) Providing the governing board of the transit
 district and the Legislature with an annual report summarizing the number of prohibition orders that were issued by the transit district during the preceding year, including, but not limited to, the types and numbers of citations by category, and the number of exclusion orders appealed, the appeals granted, the reasons granted, and other relevant information directly related to those orders.

(d) The transit district may use an existing advisory committee to fulfill the requirements of this section, provided that the composition and purpose of the existing advisory committee meet or are modified to meet the requirements of this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, “transit district” means the Sacramento Regional Transit District, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority, the Fresno Area Express, the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District,
 the Santa Clara Valley Transportation
 Authority, or the Santa Monica Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 189, Sec. 2.   (SB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

99173.

(a) Before the procurement of a new bus to be used in revenue operations, a public transit operator shall take into consideration recommendations of, and best practices standards developed by, the exclusive representative of the recognized organization representing bus operators of the transit operator for the
 following purposes:

(1) To reduce the risk of assault on bus operators.

(2) To prevent accidents caused by blind spots created by bus equipment or bus design.

(3) To enhance the safety of passengers, bus operators, or other vehicles or pedestrians that the bus may come into contact with while in service.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a public transit operator to implement specific recommendations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 126, Sec. 1.   (AB 673)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

99175.

(a) A public entity that operates, or contracts for the operation of, a commuter rail system shall ensure that each train has an automated external defibrillator (AED) as part of its safety equipment subject to the requirements in Section 1797.196 of the Health and Safety Code. As used in this subdivision, “commuter rail system” does not include intercity passenger rail services, including state-funded intercity passenger rail services managed under an interagency transfer agreement by the LOSSAN Rail Corridor Agency, the San Joaquin Joint Powers Authority, or the Capitol Corridor Joint Powers Authority, and does not include light rail or rapid transit services managed by local agencies.

(b) An affected public entity may provide training for their employees on the
 use of the AEDs as part of their regularly scheduled safety or other training sessions.

(c) (1) An affected public entity shall install AEDs pursuant to this section by July 1, 2020.

(2) The Peninsula Corridor Joint Powers Board shall be exempt from paragraph (1) and shall instead ensure that trainsets procured as part of the Caltrain Electrification Project are equipped with AEDs.

(d) (1) Upon completion of the installation of AEDs, the public entity shall transmit confirmation of its compliance in writing to the Public Utilities Commission.

(2) If an affected public entity is in compliance with the requirements of this section when it becomes effective, it shall notify the Public Utilities Commission
 pursuant to paragraph (1).

(e) An affected public entity that acquires an AED for emergency care pursuant to this section shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from any acts or omissions in the rendering of the emergency care by use of an AED if the public entity has complied with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1797.196 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 254.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

99176.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Lactation room” means a room or other location open to members of the public to express breast milk in a private and secure location that meets both of the following conditions:

(A) Includes, at a minimum, a chair, an electrical outlet, and a shelf, table, or other surface other than the floor upon which equipment used to express breast milk can be placed.

(B) Is located outside of the confines of a public restroom.

(2) “Renovation” means the reconstruction of more than 25 percent of the space in the indoor area of a multimodal transit station, exclusive of train platforms, walkways, and track areas.

(3) “Multimodal transit station” means the following rail stations:

(A) Anaheim Regional Transportation Intermodal Center in the City of Anaheim.

(B) Bakersfield Station in the City of Bakersfield.

(C) Jack London Square Station in the City of Oakland.

(D) Los Angeles Union Station in the City of Los Angeles.

(E) Robert J. Cabral Station in the
 City of Stockton.

(F) Sacramento Valley Station in the City of Sacramento.

(G) Salesforce Transit Center in the City of San Francisco.

(H) San Jose Diridon Station in the City of San Jose.

(I) Santa Fe Depot in the City of San Diego.

(J) Santa Fe Passenger Depot in the City of Fresno.

(K) A rail station that meets all of the following criteria:

(i) The rail station supports the operation of an intercity
 rail service established pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 14070) of Chapter 1 of Part 5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or the rail station is, or is planned to be, served by California’s high-speed rail system pursuant to the Safe, Reliable High-Speed Passenger Train Bond Act for the 21st Century (Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 2704) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code). 

(ii) The rail station serves as a stop or transfer point
 between intercity rail or high-speed rail and local or regional rail or bus service.

(iii) The rail station has a publicly accessible indoor area of no less than 5,000 square feet and includes a public restroom.

(iv) The rail station has staff onsite during hours of operation.

(b) A multimodal transit station that begins construction or renovation on or after January 1, 2021, shall include a lactation room.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 616, Sec. 2.   (AB 752)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

99177.

(a) For the purpose of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Institute” means the Mineta Transportation Institute at San Jose State University.

(2) “Street harassment” means words, gestures, or actions directed at a specific person in a public place, without the consent of that person, because of a characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the
 Government Code, that the person experiences as intimidating, alarming, terrorizing, or threatening to their safety. For the purposes of this section, street harassment because of age shall include any chronological age.

(3) “Survey data” means information regarding public transit riders and their experiences using public transit, including, but not limited to, demographic information about riders and information about their experiences with safety, including, but not limited to, street harassment.

(4) “Transit operator” means the 10 transit operators, as defined in Section 99210, with the most unlinked passenger trips in 2019 in the state, according to the National Transit Database.

(b) (1) On or before December 31, 2023, the institute shall develop and make available on its internet website a survey for the purpose of promoting consistency in the collection of survey data
 to inform efforts to improve the safety of riders and reduce street harassment on public transit.

(2) The survey shall include questions asking for the following information:

(A) Demographic information regarding riders, including their race, ethnicity, religion, age, disability, income, primary language, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, and sexual orientation.

(B) Information regarding a rider’s experiences with safety while waiting at public transit stops and riding public transit, including:

(i) Whether a rider experiences street harassment.

(ii) The frequency
 with which a rider experiences street harassment.

(iii) The type of street harassment experienced by a rider.

(iv) The actual or perceived characteristics that serve as the basis for street harassment experienced by a rider.

(v) Where and when a rider experiences street harassment, including on what mode of transit.

(vi) Whether a rider experiencing street harassment is alone or accompanied by others.

(vii) Whether a rider experiencing street harassment reports the incident, and, if so, to whom and the response received.

(viii) The impact
 of street harassment on a rider, including whether and how they change their use of transit.

(ix) A rider’s perceptions of safety while using transit.

(3) In developing the survey, the institute shall consult with organizations representing subpopulations impacted by street harassment and with transit operators. The institute shall consider existing efforts by a transit operator to collect survey data and
 make recommendations on how a transit operator may use or update available survey data instead of collecting new survey data.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 318, Sec. 2.   (SB 1161)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

99178.

(a) For purposes of this section, the terms “street harassment,” “survey data,” and “transit operator” have the same meanings as defined in Section 99177.

(b) (1) On or before December 31, 2024, a transit operator shall collect and publish survey data, in accordance with this section, to the extent feasible with the funding it receives to implement this section from the Department of Transportation pursuant to paragraph (2), for the purpose of informing their efforts to improve the safety of riders and reduce street harassment on public transit.

(2) On or before July 1, 2024, the Department of Transportation shall enter into a funding agreement with a transit
 operator to collect and publish the survey data described in paragraph (1).

(c) A transit operator shall collect, at a minimum, the information described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 99177.

(d) A transit operator may, but is not required to, use the survey made available pursuant to Section 99177 and may ask additional questions beyond those in the survey.

(e) A transit operator shall conduct outreach activities with subpopulations of riders who are underrepresented in surveys and impacted by street harassment to gain insight into the perspectives of these riders based on their experiences. Activities may include focus groups, participatory workshops, or other methods of engaging riders. Subpopulations may include, but are not limited to, women riders, non-English-speaking riders, LGBTQ+ riders, and
 riders with disabilities.

(f) A transit operator may collect survey data in multiple languages to reach limited-English-proficient riders impacted by street harassment. The languages may be determined by existing data on riders or the top non-English languages used by limited-English-proficient persons in the community served by the transit operator according to the most recent American Community Survey by the United States Census Bureau.

(g) (1) A transit operator shall publish and make publicly available on its internet website all survey data collected pursuant to this section, including the information described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 99177, as required by subdivision (c).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a transit operator shall not publish any personally
 identifiable information.

(3) A transit operator shall promptly notify the Governor and the Legislature of the publication of the survey data.

(h) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, any information described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 99177 collected by a transit operator in the five years before the effective date of this section shall be deemed to be survey data collected by the transit operator pursuant to this section, and any outreach activities conducted by a transit operator to collect that information in the five years before the effective date of this section shall be deemed to have been conducted by the transit operator pursuant to this section.

(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create new or additional liability for a transit operator for failing
 to respond to an incident of street harassment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 396, Sec. 2.   (SB 434)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Transportation Development [99200. - 99420.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [99200. - 99217.]

99200.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mills-Alquist-Deddeh Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99201.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this article shall govern construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99203.

“Claimant” or any derivative term, such as “applicant,” means an operator, city, county, or consolidated transportation service agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1120.)
-------------------------------------------

99204.

“City” means a city within the county having the fund from which the disbursement will be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99204.3.

“Commission” means the California Transportation Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

99204.5.

“Consolidated transportation service agency” means an agency designated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 15975 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1120.)
-------------------------------------------

99204.6.

“Controller” means the Controller of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 988, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

99205.

“County” includes a city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99205.5.

“Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

99205.6.

“Director” means the Director of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

99205.7.

“Fare revenues” means the revenue object classes 401, 402, and 403 as specified in Section 630.12 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as now or as may hereafter be amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1002.)
-------------------------------------------

99206.

“Fund” means the local transportation fund established by a county under Article 11 (commencing with Section 29530) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

99206.5.

“Disabled person” means any individual who by reason of illness, injury, age, congenital malfunction, or other permanent or temporary incapacity or disability, including, but not limited to, any individual confined to a wheelchair, is unable, without special facilities or special planning or design, to utilize public transportation facilities and services as effectively as a person who is not so affected.

As used in this section, a temporary incapacity or disability is an incapacity or a disability which lasts more than 90 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 6.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99207.

(a) “Included municipal operator” means a city or county which is included, in whole or in part, within a transit district or which has been extended the authority to join a transit district by that district’s enabling legislation, and in which city or county public transportation services have continuously been provided, since at least January 1, 1971, by the city or county, by a nonprofit corporation
 or other legal entity wholly owned by the city or county, or by the University of California.

(b) “Included municipal operator” also means the City and County of San Francisco and the Counties of Alameda and Contra Costa with respect to any portion of the unincorporated area thereof, and any city in those counties, which is outside the area of the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District and which is not receiving adequate local public transportation services, as determined by the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, from any of the transit districts which includes the county or city, taking into consideration, among other things, the amount of such services needed in the county or city, the cost to provide such services, and the amount of such services provided in other areas of the transit district as compared to their needs.

(c) “Included municipal operator” also means any city
 within the County of Sacramento which (1) is outside the activated boundaries of the Sacramento Regional Transit District, (2) contracts with the district for transit services, and (3) provides local transit services within the city that the Sacramento Area Council of Governments annually determines can be better provided by the city than the district, taking into consideration, among other things, the amount and the nature of the services required in the city, the ability of the district to provide the services, the coordination of the services with district services, the remoteness of the city in relation to other district services, the cost of providing the services, the funds available to provide the services, and the amount of services provided in other areas of the district compared to their needs.

(d) “Included municipal operator” also means any city or unincorporated area
 within the County of Los Angeles (1) that is not receiving adequate local public transportation services, as determined by the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority, from either the Southern California Rapid Transit District or any currently “included municipal operator” as defined in this section, and (2) that meets the criteria established by the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority, taking into consideration, among other things, the cost to provide such services, the amount of such services needed in the county or city, the funds available to provide such services, and the amount of such services provided in other areas of the county as compared to their needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 7.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

99207.5.

In Los Angeles County, an “eligible municipal operator” is a transit operator that has been designated eligible to receive formula-equivalent funds allocable for transit operating purposes, other than funds specifically included in the formula allocation program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 554, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

99208.

“Included transit district” means any of the following which has operated a public transportation system since at least January 1, 1971:

(a) A transit district whose boundaries are contained entirely within those of a larger transit district.

(b) A district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

99209.

“Municipal operator” means a city or county, including any nonprofit corporation or other legal entity wholly owned or controlled by the city or county, which operates a public transportation system, or which on July 1, 1972, financially supported, in whole or in part, a privately owned public transportation system, and which is not included, in whole or in part, within an existing transit district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

99209.1.

“Municipal operator” also means any county which is located in part within a transit district and which operates a public transportation system in the unincorporated area of the county not within the area of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1002.)
-------------------------------------------

99209.5.

“Operates” for purposes of Sections 99209 and 99215, and “operation” for purposes of paragaraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 99289, mean that the operator owns or leases the equipment, establishes routes and frequency of service, regulates and collects fares, and otherwise controls the efficiency and quality of the operation of the system, but does not require that operators of rolling stock be employees of a public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 544, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99210.

“Operator” means any transit district, included transit district, municipal operator, included municipal operator, or transit development board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

99210.1.
